District of Columbia statutes.
48-832.03

Enforcement.

A violation of this subchapter is a violation of Chapter 39 of Title 28, for which a fine of not more than $10,000 may be adjudged.

May 18, 2004, D.C. Law 15-164, § 203, 51 DCR 3688
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-191, § 88(b), 53 DCR 6794
D.C. Law 16-191 validated a previously made technical correction.